Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,101
Commissioner; qualifications; requirements.

Every commissioner shall be a resident of the area of operation of the housing agency which he or she has been appointed to serve. However, if after appointment a commissioner ceases to reside in the local housing agency's area of operation, his or her term of office shall automatically terminate and a successor shall be appointed to fill such vacancy in the manner provided in sections 71-1594 to 71-15,105. Any commissioner who ceases to reside within the area of operation of the local housing agency in which such commissioner serves shall immediately so inform the board of commissioners of the agency and the appointing authority of his or her change in residence. No person who has been convicted of a felony shall be eligible for appointment or service as a commissioner.

Any commissioner of a local housing agency for a city of the metropolitan class shall, at the expense of the local housing agency, attain a commissioner's certification from the National Association of Housing and Redevelopment Officials, or equivalent certification from a nationally recognized professional association in the housing and redevelopment field as determined by the local housing agency, within twelve months after the date of appointment or by December 31, 2019, whichever is later, or shall be deemed to have resigned his or her position effective at the end of that time.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 30;

Laws 2018, LB399, § 3.
July 19, 2018